Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-474
Riot or breach of peace.

Any person subject to this code who causes or participates in any riot or breach of the peace shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 74, p. 1579.